src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The 18th century Southern Saami language adjectives compare.

LEXICON as
+A+Sg+Nom:%>es # ;
+A:as xc_oblique ;

LEXICON ac
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A: xc_oblique ;

LEXICON av
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A:e xv_oblique ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
