src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the 18th century Southern Saami language describe the entities nouns refer to.

LEXICON Adjectives
stuores:stuor as "stor" ;
puorak ac "god" ;
nuor av "ung" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
